test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_fadda__dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - čááná: # á-stems
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom: čááṇá
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Acc: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill: čááṇán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc: čáánást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Sg+Abe: čánáttáá
    čááná+N+Ess: čáánnán
    čááná+N+Par: čáánnád
    čááná+N+Pl+Nom: čáánáh
    čááná+N+Pl+Gen: čáánái
    čááná+N+Pl+Acc: čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Ill: čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Loc: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Pl+Com: čánáiguin
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe: čánáittáá

  Noun - kiälkká:
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Nom:  kiälˊkká
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Gen:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Acc:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Ill:  kiälkán
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Loc:  kiälhást
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Com:  kiälˊháin
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊlháttáá
    kiälkká+N+Ess:  kiälkkán
    kiälkká+N+Par:  kiälkkád
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Nom:  kiälháh
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Gen: [kiälhái, kiäˊlhái]
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Acc:  kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Ill:  kiälˊháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Loc:  kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊlháiguin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊlháittáá

  Noun - miärkká:
    miärkká+N+Sg+Nom:  miärˊkká
    miärkká+N+Sg+Gen:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Acc:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Ill:  miärkán
    miärkká+N+Sg+Loc:  miärhást
    miärkká+N+Sg+Com:  miärˊháin
    miärkká+N+Sg+Abe:  miäˊrháttáá
    miärkká+N+Ess:  miärˊkkán
    miärkká+N+Par:  miärˊkkád
    miärkká+N+Pl+Nom:  miärháh
    miärkká+N+Pl+Gen: [miärhái, miäˊrhái]
    miärkká+N+Pl+Acc:  miärháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Ill:  miärˊháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Loc:  miärháin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Com:  miäˊrháiguin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Abe:  miäˊrháittáá

  Noun - riävská:
    riävská+N+Sg+Nom:  riävˊská
    riävská+N+Sg+Gen:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Acc:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Ill:  riävskán
    riävská+N+Sg+Loc:  riävskást
    riävská+N+Sg+Com:  riävˊskáin
    riävská+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊvskáttáá
    riävská+N+Ess:  riävˊskán
    riávská+N+Par: riävˊskán
    riävská+N+Pl+Nom:  riävskáh
    riävská+N+Pl+Gen: [riävskái, riäˊvskái]
    riävská+N+Pl+Acc:  riävskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Ill:  riävˊskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Loc:  riävskáin
    riävská+N+Pl+Com:  riäˊvskáiguin
    riävská+N+Pl+Abe:  riäˊvskáittáá

  Noun - riätká:
    riätká+N+Sg+Nom:  riätˊká
    riätká+N+Sg+Gen:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Acc:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Ill:  riätkán
    riätká+N+Sg+Loc:  riäđhást
    riätká+N+Sg+Com:  riäđˊháin
    riätká+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊđháttáá
    riätká+N+Ess:  riätˊkán
    riätká+N+Ess:  riätˊkád
    riätká+N+Pl+Nom:  riäđháh
    riätká+N+Pl+Gen: [riäđhái, riäˊđhái]
    riätká+N+Pl+Acc:  riäđháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Ill:  riäđˊháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Loc:  riäđháin
    riätká+N+Pl+Com:  riäˊđháiguin
    riätká+N+Pl+Abe:  riäˊđháittáá

  Noun - vuástá:
    vuástá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuásˊtá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuástán
    vuástá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuástást
    vuástá+N+Sg+Com:  vuásˊtáin
    vuástá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊstáttáá
    vuástá+N+Ess:  vuásˊtán
    vuástá+N+Par:  vuásˊtád
    vuástá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuástáh
    vuástá+N+Pl+Gen: [vuástái, vuáˊstái]
    vuástá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuástáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuásˊtáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuástáin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊstáiguin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊstáittáá
